New York, session 2025-2026, A3135.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Sections 300, 301, 302, 303, 304, 305, 306, 307, 308, 309, 2 310, 311, 312, 313, 314, and 315 of the highway law are REPEALED. 3 § 2. This act shall take effect immediately. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD03740-01-5